Louisiana, session 2026, HB183.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 44 of Title 13 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 13:6001and 6002, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 44. ACCESS TO CELLULAR DEVICES IN
COURTS AND COURTHOUSES
§6001. Legislative findings; intent
A. The legislature recognizes that access to courts and courthouses is vital
to the operation of the judicial system in this state. The legislature also recognizes
that a fundamental requirement for the proper operation of the Louisiana judicial
system is the ability to have access to means of communication, research, and vital
information while participating in court proceedings. Louisiana citizens should have
access to means of communication, research, and vital information in a timely
manner on matters pertinent to them and their pending judicial matters.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-371 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 183
B. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to authorize the use of cell
phones in all courts and courthouses in this state to allow access to means of
communication, research, and vital information while participating in court
proceedings.
§6002. Access to courts and courthouses; cell phone usage
A. The provisions of this Section apply to all courts in this state, including
but not limited to the Louisiana Supreme Court, courts of appeal, family courts,
juvenile courts, parish courts, city courts, municipal courts, and traffic courts.
B. No court shall adopt rules that prohibit the use of cellular devices,
including but not limited to cellular phones in the portions of the courthouse outside
of the courtroom. Each court may adopt rules that prohibit the use of cellular
devices, including but not limited to cellular phones in the areas inside the
courtroom.